Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0369.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6y. (1) Not later than December 31, 2026, the commission shall create an online transparency tool to calculate the cost of renewable energy to customers in this state. The tool must calculate the cost over the estimated useful operating lifetime of the renewable energy system and include, but not be limited to, both of the following: (a) The cost of construction including all of the following: (i) Site acquisition and preparation. (ii) Construction costs. (iii) Component costs. (iv) Assembly costs. (v) Grid connection costs. (vi) Operation and maintenance costs. (b) End-of-life costs including all of the following: (i) Decommissioning the renewable energy system, including the date the renewable energy system will be decommissioned. (ii) Disposal of components of the renewable energy system, including a description of the method of disposal for those components. (iii) Remediation of the site of the renewable energy system to preconstruction status. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Renewable energy" means that term as defined in section 11 of the clean and renewable energy and energy waste reduction act, 2008 PA 295, MCL 460.1011. (b) "Renewable energy system" means that term as defined in section 11 of the clean and renewable energy and energy waste reduction act, 2008 PA 295, MCL 460.1011.